New York, session 2025-2026, A11061.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Sections 1, 2 and 7 of chapter 63 of the laws of 1971 2 incorporating the "Centerport Volunteer Exempt Firemen's Benevolent 3 Association" and providing for its powers and duties, are amended to 4 read as follows: 5 Section 1. Incorporation: membership. A not-for-profit corporation by 6 the name of "Centerport Volunteer Exempt [Firemen's] Firefighter's 7 Benevolent Association" is hereby created. It shall be composed of such 8 persons eligible to membership therein as hereinafter provided as shall 9 (a) notify the secretary of the Centerport Fire Department Company, a 10 volunteer fire company, in writing prior to the organization meeting of 11 such corporation hereinafter provided for of their desire to become 12 members, or (b) shall attend such meeting or an adjournment thereof, and 13 also such persons so eligible as may thereafter become members of such 14 corporation, pursuant to its by-laws. 15 § 2. Persons eligible to membership. All persons who are now, or have 16 been, or hereafter shall be active volunteer members of the Centerport 17 Fire Department Company, in the town of Huntington, County of Suffolk, 18 or of any fire corporation in the Centerport Fire District in such town 19 and who have acquired or shall hereafter acquire the status of exempt 20 volunteer [fireman] firefighter as defined in section two hundred of the 21 general municipal law by virtue of having rendered service in the 22 Centerport Fire Department Company or in a fire corporation in the 23 Centerport Fire District, and all persons who are now or hereafter shall 24 be active volunteer members of the Centerport Fire Department Company 25 shall be eligible for membership in the corporation created by this act, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15380-03-6 A. 11061--A 2 1 except that any [fireman] firefighter who has been removed for cause, 2 expelled or dropped from the rolls of any fire company or fire depart- 3 ment, and who has not been reinstated therein, shall not be eligible for 4 membership in such corporation. The membership of any person in such 5 corporation shall terminate when [his] their membership as an active or 6 volunteer member of the Centerport Fire Department Company shall termi- 7 nate before such person shall have acquired the status of exempt volun- 8 teer [fireman] firefighter as defined in section two hundred of the 9 general municipal law by virtue of having rendered service in the 10 Centerport Fire Department Company. 11 § 7. Precept for payment of foreign fire insurance premium taxes. 12 Notwithstanding any contrary provisions of any general, special or local 13 law, or of any city charter or ordinance, heretofore or hereinafter 14 enacted, such corporation shall collect and there shall be paid to it 15 all taxes imposed by section [five hundred fifty-three] nine thousand 16 one hundred four of the insurance law for fire department use and bene- 17 fit, upon premiums for insurance against loss or damage by fire covering 18 property situated in the Centerport Fire District in the Town of Hunt- 19 ington, County of Suffolk, or within any duly organized territory in 20 which the Centerport Fire Department Company is or may be obligated to 21 render fire protection. The officer of said corporation designated by 22 its by-laws to collect and receive the aforesaid tax shall have the 23 powers and be subject to all the provisions of the insurance law, relat- 24 ing to treasurers of fire departments. Such corporation shall also be 25 entitled to receive a share of the tax imposed by section [five hundred 26 fifty-four] nine thousand one hundred five of the insurance law, based 27 upon the business written in the territory with respect to which it is 28 entitled to collect and receive the tax under section [five hundred 29 fifty-three] nine thousand one hundred four of the insurance law. Such 30 taxes shall only be used [for the care and relief of disabled or indi- 31 gent volunteer and exempt volunteer firemen and their families] by the 32 corporation in furtherance of its purposes as set forth in section three 33 of this act. 34 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 35 the amendments to section 7 of chapter 63 of the laws of 1971 made by 36 section one of this act shall apply to taxes due on premiums received on 37 or after January 1, 2027.